Utah statutes.
58-63-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  a contract security company employing the services of an unlicensed armed private security officer or unarmed private security officer, except as provided under Section 58-63-304 or 58-63-310;

(2)  an armored car company employing the services of an unlicensed armored car security officer, except as provided under Section 58-63-304 or 58-63-310;

(3)  filing with the division fingerprint cards for an applicant that are not those of the applicant, or are in any other way false or fraudulent and intended to mislead the division in its consideration of the qualifications of the applicant for licensure;

(4)  practicing or engaging in, or attempting to practice or engage in, activity for which a license is required under this chapter, unless the individual:

(a)  holds the appropriate license under this chapter; or

(b)  is exempted from licensure as provided under Section 58-63-304 or 58-63-310; and

(5)  knowingly employing another person to engage in or practice or attempt to engage in or practice an occupation or profession licensed under this chapter, if the employee:

(a)  is not licensed to do so under this chapter; or

(b)  is not exempt from licensure.



Amended by Chapter 246, 2008 General Session

